Georgia statutes. 
(g) (1) By May 15, 2019, and then by February 15, 2020, and annually thereafter, each joint authority with established revenue sharing agreements between the joint authority and its participating local governments and revenue emanating pursuant to such an agreement shall furnish to the state revenue commissioner and the state auditor:

(A) A statement that identifies and separately states all real and personal property and all property interests that are owned, in part or in full, by such joint authority together with the nature of any encumbrances, liens, or covenants on such property;

(B) A complete copy of all current agreements or contracts related to such joint authority that are between or among one or more counties, municipalities, joint authorities, or private parties that references matters related to taxation, payments in lieu of taxation, tax abatements, leasehold interests or estates, leaseback agreements, or the sharing of revenue, funds, fees, taxes, assessments, fines, or any other income; and

(C) All additional information determined by the state revenue commissioner or state auditor to be necessary to accurately determine the net taxable digest of each county or municipality participating in such joint authority and any affected school district.

(2) The information compiled by the state auditor pursuant to this subsection shall be utilized in determining any equalized adjusted property tax digest prepared pursuant to Code Section 48-5-274.

(3) On or before July 1, 2019, and then on or before April 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, a report that compiles the information gathered by the state auditor and that sets out the net impact of the total activities of the joint authority on the tax digest of each affected taxing jurisdiction shall be furnished to the tax commissioner of each affected county, to the governing authority of each affected county or municipality, to each affected local board of education, to the joint development authority, and to the State Board of Education. Each tax commissioner shall utilize such net impact to adjust the net assessed value of each of his or her taxing jurisdictions in order to fully account for activities of any joint authority in digest values submitted pursuant to Code Sections 48-5-32 and 48-5-32.1.

(4) The state revenue commissioner and the state auditor shall be authorized to:

(A) Conduct audits of any joint authority subject to the requirements of this subsection; and

(B) Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer, implement, and enforce this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 1419, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 928, § 7; Ga. L. 1995, p. 585, § 9; Ga. L. 2003, p. 390, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 921, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 767, § 1/HB 406.)

Annotations

The 2019 amendment, effective May 7, 2019, added subsection (g).

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, in subsection (f), "commissioner of community affairs" was substituted for "Commissioner of community affairs" in the second sentence and "Board of Community Affairs" was substituted for "board of community affairs" in the fourth sentence.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, in paragraph (e)(2), "located" was substituted for "locating" in the second sentence.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1994, p. 928, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Georgia Business Expansion Support Act of 1994.'"

Ga. L. 1994, p. 928, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that this Act was applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1994.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 585, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that this Act was applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1995.

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Job Tax Credit Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Community Affairs, Chapter 110-9.

Law reviews. - For note on the 1994 amendment of this Code section, see 11 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 249 (1994).

For article, "Revenue and Taxation: Amend Titles 48, 2, 28, 33, 36, 46, and 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, Relating Respectively to Revenue and Taxation, Agriculture, the General Assembly, Insurance, Local Government, Public Utilities, and State Government," see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 217 (2011).

36-62-6. Powers of authority generally.

Statute text

(a) Each authority shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

(1) To bring and defend actions;

(2) To adopt and amend a corporate seal;

(3) To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary to exercise the powers of the authority, any of which contracts may be made with the county in which the authority is located or with any one or more municipal corporations in such county; each such county and all municipal corporations therein are authorized to enter into contracts with the authority;

(4) To receive and administer gifts, grants, and devises of any property and to administer trusts;

(5) To acquire, by purchase, gift, or construction, any real or personal property desired to be acquired as part of any project or for the purpose of improving, extending, adding to, reconstructing, renovating, or remodeling any project or part thereof already acquired or for the purpose of demolition to make room for such project or any part thereof;

(6) To sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, mortgage, dispose of, or grant options for any real or personal property or interest therein for any such purposes;

(7) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (7.1) of this Code section, to dispose of any real property for fair market value, regardless of prior development of such property as a project, whenever the board of directors of the authority may deem such disposition to be in the best interests of the authority if the board of directors of the authority prior to such disposition shall determine that such real property no longer can be used advantageously as a project for the development of trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities;

(7.1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, to dispose of any real property for fair market value or any amount below fair market value as determined by the board of directors of the authority, regardless of prior development of such property as a project, whenever the board of directors of the authority may deem such disposition to be in the best interests of the authority if the board of directors of the authority prior to such disposition shall determine that such real property no longer can be used advantageously as a project for the development of trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities and if title to such real property is to be transferred to the state;

(8) To mortgage, convey, pledge, or assign any properties, revenues, income, tolls, charges, or fees owned or received by the authority;

(9) To appoint officers and retain agents, engineers, attorneys, fiscal agents, accountants, and employees and to provide for their compensation and duties;

(10) To extend credit or make loans to any person, firm, corporation, or other industrial entity for the planning, design, construction, acquisition, or carrying out of any project, which credit or loans shall be secured by loan agreements, mortgages, security agreements, contracts, and all other instruments, fees, or charges, upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall determine reasonable in connection with such loans, including provision for the establishment and maintenance of reserves and insurance funds; and, in the exercise of powers granted by this Code section in connection with a project for such person, firm, corporation, or other industrial entity, to require the inclusion in any contract, loan agreement, security agreement, or other instrument, of such provisions for guaranty, insurance, construction, use, operation, maintenance, and financing of a project as the authority may deem necessary or desirable;

(11) To acquire, accept, or retain equitable interests, security interests, or other interest in any property, real or personal, by mortgage, assignment, security agreement, pledge, conveyance, contract, lien, loan agreement, or other consensual transfer, in order to secure the repayment of any moneys loaned or credit extended by the authority;

(12) To construct, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, extend, improve, and equip projects located on land owned or leased by the authority or land owned or leased by others and to pay all or part of the cost of any such project from the proceeds of revenue bonds of the authority or from any contribution or loans by persons, firms, or corporations or any other contribution, all of which the authority is authorized to receive, accept, and use;

(13) To borrow money and issue its revenue bonds and bond anticipation notes from time to time and to use the proceeds thereof for the purpose of paying all or part of the cost of any project, including the cost of extending, adding to, or improving the project, or for the purpose of refunding any such bonds of the authority theretofore issued and to otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter and to pay all other costs of the authority incident to or necessary and appropriate to such purposes, including the providing of funds to be paid into any fund or funds to secure such bonds and notes, provided that all such bonds and notes shall be issued in accordance with the procedures and subject to the limitations set forth in Code Section 36-62-8;

(14) As security for repayment of authority obligations, to pledge, mortgage, convey, assign, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber any property, real or personal, of such authority and to execute any trust agreement, indenture, or security agreement containing any provisions not in conflict with law, which trust agreement, indenture, or security agreement may provide for foreclosure or forced sale of any property of the authority upon default, on such obligations, either in payment of principal or interest or in the performance of any term or condition, as are contained in such agreement or indenture. This state, on behalf of itself and each county, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or taxing district therein, waives any right which it or such county, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or taxing district may have to prevent the forced sale or foreclosure of any property of the authority so mortgaged or encumbered, and any such mortgage or encumbrance may be foreclosed in accordance with law and the terms thereof;

(15) If any authority authorizing an air transportation facility, to contract with any county or municipal corporation in the state; and any county or municipal corporation in the state is empowered to contract with any such authority to furnish air transportation services where such service is not otherwise in existence;

(16) To expend for the promotion of industry, agriculture, and trade within its area of operations any funds of the authority determined by the authority to be in excess of those needed for the other corporate purposes of the authority; and

(17) To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly conferred by this chapter.

(b) This Code section shall not be construed as authorizing an authority as defined in this chapter to exercise the power of eminent domain.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 531, § 5; Ga. L. 1969, p. 137, § 4; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1259, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 708, § 3; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1067, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1044, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 440, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 23/HB 1313.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as 'The Landowner's Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.'"

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews. - For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006). For annual survey on real property, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 251 (2017).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Nursing home is proper project. - Health care need not be listed in the Constitution as a public purpose for nursing homes to be a proper project under O.C.G.A. Ch. 62, T. 36. Development Auth. v. Beverly Enters., 247 Ga. 64, 274 S.E.2d 324 (1981).

Development authority not required to own or operate project to issue bonds. - Proposed bond transaction did not violate Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I and O.C.G.A. § 36-82-66 of the Revenue Bond Law merely because the development authority would not own or operate the proposed stadium; the development authority could use bond proceeds for paying all or part of the cost of any project (O.C.G.A. § 36-62-6(a)(13)), not only those projects the authority developed, and the authority could pay the costs of another government entity's project pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-62-9. Cottrell v. Atlanta Dev. Auth., 297 Ga. 1, 770 S.E.2d 616 (2015).

Cited in Day v. Development Auth., 248 Ga. 488, 284 S.E.2d 275 (1981).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Equipment certified as necessary if enhances pollution abatement goal. - Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources may certify equipment or facilities as necessary and in furtherance of pollution abatement and control purposes, pursuant to this chapter and apposite Internal Revenue Service regulations, if the equipment or facilities enhance the industry's pollution abatement goal and, although possibly having other functions, have as their predominant purpose the assistance or aid of pollution control or abatement. 1973 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 73-175.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 485 et seq., 554. 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 72.

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1143 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1279, 1280, 1602 et seq.

ALR. - Provision in statute or ordinance limiting rate of interest per annum as precluding requirement of payment at maximum rate at intervals of less than a year, 29 A.L.R. 1109.

Disposition of revenues from operation of revenue-producing enterprise owned by municipal corporation, 165 A.L.R. 854.

36-62-6.1. Obtaining real property within adjoining county which will be exchanged for federal property.

Statute text

No development authority of a county or municipality within the county or joint development authority within the county shall purchase or accept title to any real property located in an adjoining county, which property will be exchanged for certain property belonging to the federal government as authorized by federal law, without the written consent of the governing authority of such adjoining county wherein the real property is located; provided, however, that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to any agreement entered into by two or more counties, municipal corporations, consolidated governments, or development authorities or any combination thereof prior to July 1, 1994, nor shall the transfer of any land pursuant to any such agreement be affected by this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-62-6.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1940, § 3.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, "this Code section" was substituted for "this Code Section" near the middle of this Code section.

36-62-7. Operation of project by governmental units prohibited; sale or lease of property for operation.

Statute text

No project acquired under this chapter shall be operated by an authority or any municipal corporation, county, or other governmental subdivision. Such a project shall be leased or sold to, or managed by, one or more persons, firms, or private corporations. Any disposition of real property by an authority pursuant to paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Code Section 36-62-6 shall be made to one or more persons, firms, corporations, or governmental or public entities. If revenue bonds or other obligations are to be issued to pay all or part of the cost of the project, the project must be so leased or the contract for its sale or management must be entered into prior to or simultaneously with the issuance of the bonds or obligations; provided, however, that the acquisition and development of land by an authority as the site for an industrial park as provided in this chapter or the acquisition and development of land by an authority as the site for a sports facility or amphitheater in accordance with Code Section 36-62-2 and the operation of such a sports facility or amphitheater shall not be deemed to be the operation of a project and, notwithstanding anything in this chapter to the contrary, an authority shall not be required to enter into a lease of such a project or a contract for its sale or management as a condition to the issuance of bonds or other obligations of the authority to provide financing therefor. If sold, the purchase price may be paid at one time or in installments falling due over not more than 40 years from the date of transfer of possession. The lessee or purchaser shall be required to pay all costs of operating and maintaining the leased or purchased property and to pay rentals or installments in amounts sufficient to pay the principal of and the interest and premium, if any, on all of its bonds and other obligations as such principal and interest become due. If the project is managed, the management contract must contain a term not less than the final maturity date of any bonds or other obligations of the authority to provide financing for the managed project and must provide that all costs of operating and maintaining the managed project, including all management fees payable under the management contract, shall be paid solely from the revenues of the managed project and from the proceeds of any bonds or other obligations of the authority to provide financing for the managed project. Any such management contract may contain provisions allowing the authority to terminate the management contract, but if the authority exercises any right to terminate a management contract, it must immediately enter into another management contract meeting the requirements of this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 531, § 6; Ga. L. 1969, p. 137, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1706, §§ 3, 8; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1067, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1105, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 390, § 3; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 36/SB 365.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted "paragraph (7) of subsection (a)" for "paragraph (7)" in the third sentence of this Code section.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Memorandum of agreement establishing valuation method part of lease agreement. - Because a memorandum of agreement establishing the valuation methodology to be used in assessing ad valorem taxes on a leasehold estate was referenced by the lease and dictated the methodology to be used to value a corporation's leasehold estate for ad valorem tax purposes, it constituted an integral part of the lease agreement and was properly before the trial court; in a transaction in which revenue bonds will be paid through lease proceeds, all agreements relating to the lease are properly within the trial court's jurisdiction. Sherman v. Dev. Auth., 317 Ga. App. 345, 730 S.E.2d 113 (2012).

Cited in Development Auth. v. Beverly Enters., 247 Ga. 64, 274 S.E.2d 324 (1981); DeKalb County Bd. of Tax Assessors v. W.C. Harris & Co., 248 Ga. 277, 282 S.E.2d 880 (1981).

36-62-8. Obligations of authority; use of proceeds; status as revenue obligations; subsequent series of bonds or notes; bond anticipation notes; interest rates; issuance and validation.

Statute text

(a) Subject to the limitations and procedures provided by this Code section, the obligations of any authority evidenced by bonds, bond anticipation notes, trust indentures, deeds to secure obligations, security agreements, or mortgages executed in connection therewith may contain such provisions not inconsistent with law as shall be determined by the board of directors of the authority. The authority, in such instruments, may provide for the pledging of all or any part of its revenues, income, or charges and for the mortgaging, encumbering, or conveying of all or any part of its real or personal property; may covenant against pledging any or all of its revenues, income, or charges; and may further provide for the disposition of proceeds realized from the sale of any bonds and bond anticipation notes, for the replacement of lost, destroyed, stolen, or mutilated bonds and notes, and for the payment and redemption of such bonds and notes. Similarly, subject to the limitations and procedures of this Code section, undertakings of an authority may prescribe the procedure by which bondholders and noteholders may enforce rights against the authority and may provide for rights upon breach of any covenant, condition, or obligation of the authority; and bonds, resolutions, trust indentures, mortgages, or deeds to secure obligations executed by an authority and bond anticipation notes executed by an authority may contain such provisions not otherwise contrary to law as the authority shall deem necessary or desirable.

(b) The proceeds derived from the sale of all bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority shall be held and used for the ultimate purpose of paying, directly or indirectly as permitted in this chapter, all or part of the cost of any project, including the cost of extending, financing, adding to, or improving the project, for the purpose of refunding any bond anticipation notes issued in accordance with this chapter or refunding any previously issued bonds of the authority.

(c) All bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority shall be revenue obligations of the authority and may be made payable out of any revenues or other receipts, funds, or moneys of the authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of other bonds or bond anticipation notes or to particular security agreements pledging any particular revenues, receipts, funds, or moneys.

(d) Issuance by an authority of one or more series of bonds or bond anticipation notes for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds or notes in connection with the same project or with any other projects; but the proceeding wherein any subsequent bonds or bond anticipation notes are issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made in any prior security agreement or made for any prior issue of bonds or bond anticipation notes, unless in the resolution authorizing such prior issue the right is expressly reserved to the authority to issue subsequent bonds or bond anticipation notes on a parity with such prior issue.

(e) An authority shall have the power and is authorized, whenever revenue bonds of the authority have been validated as provided in this chapter, to issue, from time to time, its notes in anticipation of the issuance of such bonds as validated and to renew, from time to time, any such notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue notes only to provide funds which would otherwise be provided by the issuance of the bonds as validated. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. As with its bonds, the authority may sell such notes at public or private sale. Any resolution or resolutions authorizing notes of the authority or any issue thereof may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any resolution or resolutions authorizing bonds of the authority or any issue thereof; and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds. Validation of such bonds shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of the notes, but it shall not be required that such notes be judicially validated. Bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in an amount exceeding the par value of the bonds in anticipation of which they are to be issued.

(f) The interest rate on or rates to be borne by any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the authority shall be fixed by the board of directors of the authority. Any limitations with respect to interest rates found in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of this title or the usury laws of this state shall not apply to obligations issued under this chapter.

(g) All revenue bonds issued by an authority under this chapter shall be issued and validated under and in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 82 of this title, except as provided in subsection (f) of this Code section and except as specifically set forth below:

(1) Revenue bonds issued by an authority may be in such form, either coupon or fully registered, or both coupon and fully registered, and may be subject to such exchangeability and transferability provisions as the bond resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or any indenture or trust agreement may provide;

(2) Revenue bonds shall bear a certificate of validation. The signature of the clerk of the superior court of the judicial circuit in which the issuing authority is located may be made on the certificate of validation of such bonds by facsimile or by manual execution, stating the date on which such bonds were validated; and such entry shall be original evidence of the fact of judgment and shall be received as original evidence in any court in this state;

(3) The notice to the district attorney or the Attorney General and the notice to the public of the time, place, and date of the validation hearing need not state the rate of interest the bonds will bear;

(4) The term "cost of project" shall have the meaning prescribed in paragraph (2) of Code Section 36-62-2 whenever referred to in bond resolutions of an authority, bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority, or notices and proceedings to validate such bonds.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 531, § 7; Ga. L. 1969, p. 137, § 6; Ga. L. 1976, p. 708, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1706, §§ 4, 9.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Revenue bonds generally, § 36-82-60 et seq.

Repeal of interest rate limitations, § 36-82-123.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Validation order insufficient. - Because a revenue bond validation order contained merely a dry recitation that certain legal requirements had been met, adequate appellate review of the trial court's decision making process was effectively prevented; the validation order did not specifically address a resident's objection that the transaction did not comply with the Development Authorities Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-62-8(b), or the process by which the court came to the court's conclusion that the proposed transaction followed all proper and necessary steps. Sherman v. Dev. Auth., 317 Ga. App. 345, 730 S.E.2d 113 (2012).

Memorandum of agreement establishing valuation method part of lease agreement. - Because a memorandum of agreement establishing the valuation methodology to be used in assessing ad valorem taxes on a leasehold estate was referenced by the lease and dictated the methodology to be used to value a corporation's leasehold estate for ad valorem tax purposes, it constituted an integral part of the lease agreement and was properly before the trial court; in a transaction in which revenue bonds will be paid through lease proceeds, all agreements relating to the lease are properly within the trial court's jurisdiction. Sherman v. Dev. Auth., 317 Ga. App. 345, 730 S.E.2d 113 (2012).

Bond approval not proper. - Trial court erred by validating taxable revenue bonds for a county development authority as the order validating the bonds failed to set forth sufficient findings of fact and conclusions of law to support the court's holdings and, thus, failed to satisfy the requirements of O.C.G.A. § 9-11-52(a). Sherman v. Dev. Auth., 320 Ga. App. 689, 740 S.E.2d 663 (2013).

Cited in Alexander v. Macon-Bibb County Urban Dev. Auth. & Urban Properties #47, 257 Ga. 181, 357 S.E.2d 62 (1987).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2118 et seq., 2125.

ALR. - Provision in statute or ordinance limiting rate of interest per annum as precluding requirement of payment at maximum rate at intervals of less than a year, 29 A.L.R. 1109.

36-62-9. Purposes of chapter; issuance of bonds or bond anticipation notes; exceptions.

Statute text

The purposes of this chapter are to develop and promote trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities for the public good and the general welfare and to promote the general welfare of the state. No bonds or bond anticipation notes, except refunding bonds, shall be issued by an authority under this chapter unless its board of directors adopts a resolution finding that the project for which such bonds or notes are to be issued will promote the foregoing objectives and will increase or maintain employment in the territorial area of such authority. Notwithstanding the foregoing requirement:

(1) Bonds or bond anticipation notes may be issued to finance projects for air and water pollution control facilities and for sewage and solid waste disposal facilities, as provided in this chapter, without a finding that the project will increase or maintain employment, so long as the appropriate certification described in this chapter has been secured from the federal, state, or local agency having jurisdiction in the premises; and

(2) Bonds or bond anticipation notes may also be issued by an authority to finance the acquisition or development of land as the site for an industrial park as provided in this chapter without a finding that the project will increase or maintain employment if its board of directors shall adopt a resolution finding that the tract of land to be included in the project is not intended for use by a single enterprise; will be suitable primarily for use as building sites for a group of enterprises engaged in industrial, distribution, or wholesale businesses; and that either:

(A) The control and administration of the tract is to be vested in the authority or in another county or joint county and municipal development authority (or in a corporation organized under Chapter 3 of Title 14, the "Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code") having as one of its purposes the development of trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities; or

(B) The uses of such tract of land are to be regulated by protective restrictions to be approved by the authority and determined by the authority to be appropriate to encourage and facilitate use thereof by business enterprises engaged in industrial, distribution, or wholesale businesses.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 531, § 9; Ga. L. 1969, p. 137, § 7; Ga. L. 1971, p. 177, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 708, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1706, §§ 5, 10; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code, T. 14, C. 3.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

General Assembly has not defined "projects" to include all trade and commerce in this state. Day v. Development Auth., 248 Ga. 488, 284 S.E.2d 275 (1981).

Fact that all final blueprints and specifications were not incorporated into resolution does not require invalidation of the bonds. Alexander v. Macon-Bibb County Urban Dev. Auth. & Urban Properties #47, 257 Ga. 181, 357 S.E.2d 62 (1987).

Development authority not required to own or operate project to issue bonds. - Proposed bond transaction did not violate Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I and O.C.G.A. § 36-82-66 of the Revenue Bond Law merely because the development authority would not own or operate the proposed stadium; the development authority could use bond proceeds for paying all or part of the cost of any project (O.C.G.A. § 36-62-6(a)(13)), not only those projects the authority developed, and the authority could pay the costs of another government entity's project pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-62-9. Cottrell v. Atlanta Dev. Auth., 297 Ga. 1, 770 S.E.2d 616 (2015).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 280 et seq. 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 113 et seq.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2122, 2123, 2125, 2134 et seq.

36-62-10. Obligations of authority not indebtedness of state or political subdivisions.

Statute text

No bonds or other obligations of and no indebtedness incurred by any authority shall constitute an indebtedness or obligation of the State of Georgia or of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof, nor shall any act of any authority in any manner constitute or result in the creation of an indebtedness of this state or of any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision. All such bonds and obligations shall be payable solely from the revenues therein pledged to such payment, including pledged rentals, sales proceeds, insurance proceeds, and condemnation awards; and no holder or holders of any such bonds or obligations shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of this state or of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof, nor to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state or of any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 531, § 12; Ga. L. 1969, p. 137, § 9.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Development authority can issue promissory note for authorized purpose if note is payable solely from revenues pledged therein for such payment. 1974 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U74-112.

36-62-11. Construction of chapter generally; effect of conflict between chapter and other provisions of law; applicability of certain other provisions of law to proceedings under chapter.

Statute text

This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof, and insofar as this chapter may be inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, including the charter of any municipal corporation, this chapter shall be controlling. The sale or issuance of bonds by any authority shall not be subject to regulation under Chapter 5 of Title 10, the "Georgia Uniform Securities Act of 2008," or any other law. No proceeding or publication not required in this chapter shall be necessary to the performance of any act authorized in this chapter, nor shall any such act be subject to referendum.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 531, § 11; Ga. L. 1969, p. 137, § 8; Ga. L. 2008, p. 381, § 11/SB 358.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

O.C.G.A. Ch. 62, T. 36 is to be liberally construed; liberally, but not ultraliberally. Day v. Development Auth., 248 Ga. 488, 284 S.E.2d 275 (1981).

Section preempted by the War on Terrorism Local Assistance Act, O.C.G.A. § 36-75-11(c). - Superior court did not err in finding that a county development authority was within the category of authorities governed by the War on Terrorism Local Assistance Act, O.C.G.A. § 36-75-11(c), because § 36-75-11(c) was a general law that preempted by implication the exemption from referenda set forth in the Development Authorities Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-62-11, as to those development authorities that met the criteria of authorities defined in § 36-75-11(c). Dev. Auth. v. State, 286 Ga. 36, 684 S.E.2d 856 (2009).

36-62-12. Previously created authority not affected by chapter.

Statute text

Any public corporation, industrial development authority, or payroll authority created prior to March 28, 1969, by legislative Act or constitutional amendment shall not be affected by this chapter but shall be entitled to continue in existence and exercise all powers heretofore or hereafter granted thereto.

History

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 137, § 12.)

36-62-13. Disposition of property of certain authorities dissolved by operation of law.

Statute text

The real and personal property of any development authority which was created for a county prior to July 1, 1983, by constitutional amendment and which was dissolved by operation of law pursuant to Article XI, Section I, Paragraph IV(c) of the Constitution shall by operation of law become the property of any development authority subsequently created by such county pursuant to this chapter or, in the absence thereof, shall become the property of the county.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-62-13, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 383, § 1.)

36-62-14. Perpetual existence of authority; dissolution.

Statute text

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, an authority created pursuant to this chapter shall have perpetual existence.

(b) If an authority does not have any outstanding unpaid bonds or bond anticipation notes, the authority may be dissolved as provided in this subsection. If the authority was activated for a single county or municipal corporation as provided in Code Section 36-62-4, the authority may be dissolved by adoption of an appropriate resolution by the governing authority of such county or municipal corporation. If the authority was activated for two or more local governments as provided in Code Section 36-62-5.1, the authority may be dissolved by the adoption of appropriate concurrent resolutions by the governing authorities of all such local governments.

(c) If an authority previously activated for a single county or municipal corporation is so dissolved, all assets and debts and rights and obligations of the former authority shall devolve to the parent county or municipal corporation. If an authority previously activated for two or more local governments is so dissolved, all assets and debts and rights and obligations of the former authority shall devolve to the parent local governments in such proportions and manner as shall be specified in the concurrent resolutions dissolving the authority.

(d) Where an authority is dissolved as provided in this Code section, it shall cease to exist as of the effective date specified in the appropriate resolution or resolutions. The dissolution of an authority, however, shall not prevent the subsequent activation of a new authority under this chapter for the same local government or local governments, in the same manner as otherwise specified in this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-62-14, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1336, § 2.)

——————————

CHAPTER 62A

CONDUCT OF MEMBERS OF LOCAL AUTHORITIES

Article 1

General Provisions.

36-62A-1. Ethics; conflicts of interest.

Article 2

Development Authorities.

36-62A-20. Development authority defined.

36-62A-21. Required training on development and redevelopment programs.

36-62A-22. Inapplicable to directors of downtown development authorities.

——————————

ARTICLE 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

36-62A-1. Ethics; conflicts of interest.

Statute text
